West Virginia, session 2026, HB4760.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 5. GENERAL POWERS AND AUTHORITY OF THE GOVERNOR, SECRETARY OF STATE AND ATTORNEY GENERAL; BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS; MISCELLANEOUS AGENCIES, COMMISSIONS, OFFICES, PROGRAMS, ETC. ARTICLE 16. WEST VIRGINIA PUBLIC EMPLOYEES INSURANCE ACT. §5-16-15a. Coverage for a dietary supplement. (a) As used in this section, “dietary supplement" means the same as in the federal Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994 and means a product, other than tobacco, that:(A) Is intended to supplement the diet and contains one or more dietary ingredients, including, but not limited to, vitamins, minerals, herbs, botanicals, amino acids, concentrates, metabolites, enzymes, prebiotics, probiotics, extracts and other substances and their constituents;(B) Is intended for ingestion in pill, capsule, tablet, liquid, gummy, or powder;(C) Is not represented for use as a conventional food or the sole item of a meal or diet; and (D) Is labeled as a dietary supplement. (b) A policy, plan, or contract that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage or reimbursement for dietary supplements as recommended by the enrollee's health care provider. CHAPTER 9. HUMAN SERVICES. ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Coverage for a dietary supplement. (a) As used in this section, “dietary supplement" means the same as in the federal Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994 and means a product, other than tobacco, that:(A) Is intended to supplement the diet and contains one or more dietary ingredients, including, but not limited to, vitamins, minerals, herbs, botanicals, amino acids, concentrates, metabolites, enzymes, prebiotics, probiotics, extracts and other substances and their constituents;(B) Is intended for ingestion in pill, capsule, tablet, liquid, gummy, or powder;(C) Is not represented for use as a conventional food or the sole item of a meal or diet; and (D) Is labeled as a dietary supplement. (b) A policy, plan, or contract that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage or reimbursement for dietary supplements as recommended by the enrollee's health care provider. CHAPTER 33. INSURANCE. ARTICLE 15. ACCIDENT AND SICKNESS INSURANCE. §33-15-4y. Coverage for a dietary supplement. (a) As used in this section, “dietary supplement" means the same as in the federal Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994 and means a product, other than tobacco, that:(A) Is intended to supplement the diet and contains one or more dietary ingredients, including, but not limited to, vitamins, minerals, herbs, botanicals, amino acids, concentrates, metabolites, enzymes, prebiotics, probiotics, extracts and other substances and their constituents;(B) Is intended for ingestion in pill, capsule, tablet, liquid, gummy, or powder;(C) Is not represented for use as a conventional food or the sole item of a meal or diet; and (D) Is labeled as a dietary supplement. (b) A policy, plan, or contract that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage or reimbursement for dietary supplements as recommended by the enrollee's health care provider. ARTICLE 16. GROUP ACCIDENT AND SICKNESS INSURANCE. §33-16-3ii. Coverage for a dietary supplement. (a) As used in this section, “dietary supplement" means the same as in the federal Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994 and means a product, other than tobacco, that:(A) Is intended to supplement the diet and contains one or more dietary ingredients, including, but not limited to, vitamins, minerals, herbs, botanicals, amino acids, concentrates, metabolites, enzymes, prebiotics, probiotics, extracts and other substances and their constituents;(B) Is intended for ingestion in pill, capsule, tablet, liquid, gummy, or powder;(C) Is not represented for use as a conventional food or the sole item of a meal or diet; and (D) Is labeled as a dietary supplement. (b) A policy, plan, or contract that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage or reimbursement for dietary supplements as recommended by the enrollee's health care provider. ARTICLE 24. HOSPITAL MEDICAL AND DENTAL CORPORATIONS. §33-24-7z. Coverage for a dietary supplement. (a) As used in this section, “dietary supplement" means the same as in the federal Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994 and means a product, other than tobacco, that:(A) Is intended to supplement the diet and contains one or more dietary ingredients, including, but not limited to, vitamins, minerals, herbs, botanicals, amino acids, concentrates, metabolites, enzymes, prebiotics, probiotics, extracts and other substances and their constituents;(B) Is intended for ingestion in pill, capsule, tablet, liquid, gummy, or powder;(C) Is not represented for use as a conventional food or the sole item of a meal or diet; and (D) Is labeled as a dietary supplement. (b) A policy, plan, or contract that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage or reimbursement for dietary supplements as recommended by the enrollee's health care provider. ARTICLE 25. HEALTHCARE CORPORATION. §33-25-8w. Coverage for a dietary supplement. (a) As used in this section, “dietary supplement" means the same as in the federal Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994 and means a product, other than tobacco, that:(A) Is intended to supplement the diet and contains one or more dietary ingredients, including, but not limited to, vitamins, minerals, herbs, botanicals, amino acids, concentrates, metabolites, enzymes, prebiotics, probiotics, extracts and other substances and their constituents;(B) Is intended for ingestion in pill, capsule, tablet, liquid, gummy, or powder;(C) Is not represented for use as a conventional food or the sole item of a meal or diet; and (D) Is labeled as a dietary supplement. (b) A policy, plan, or contract that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage or reimbursement for dietary supplements as recommended by the enrollee's health care provider. ARTICLE 25A. HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION ACT. §33-25A-8z. Coverage for a dietary supplement. (a) As used in this section, “dietary supplement" means the same as in the federal Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994 and means a product, other than tobacco, that:(A) Is intended to supplement the diet and contains one or more dietary ingredients, including, but not limited to, vitamins, minerals, herbs, botanicals, amino acids, concentrates, metabolites, enzymes, prebiotics, probiotics, extracts and other substances and their constituents;(B) Is intended for ingestion in pill, capsule, tablet, liquid, gummy, or powder;(C) Is not represented for use as a conventional food or the sole item of a meal or diet; and (D) Is labeled as a dietary supplement. (b) A policy, plan, or contract that is issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage or reimbursement for dietary supplements as recommended by the enrollee's health care provider.